Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-999
Direct care staff; psychiatric facilities caring for juveniles; standards.

The Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services shall set standards required for direct care staff of inpatient psychiatric units for juveniles and psychiatric residential treatment facilities for juveniles. The standards shall require that each such staff member:

(1) Be twenty years of age or older;

(2) Be at least two years older than the oldest resident in the unit or facility;

(3) Have a high school diploma or its equivalent; and

(4) Have appropriate training for basic interaction care such as supervision, daily living care, and mentoring of residents in the unit or facility.

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 44.